Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2219
Valuation assignment, defined.

Valuation assignment means (1) an appraisal that estimates the value of identified real estate or identified real property at a particular point in time or (2) a valuation service provided as a consequence of an agreement between a real property appraiser and a client.

Laws 1990, LB 1153, § 19;

Laws 1991, LB 203, § 20;

Laws 2006, LB 778, § 39;

Laws 2007, LB186, § 7.